Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Public Works and Contracts

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Works and Contracts § 1 et seq.

Construction and effect of “changed conditions” clause in public works or construction contract with state or its subdivision, 56 ALR4th 1042.

Public contracts: low bidder's monetary relief against state or local agency for nonaward of contract, 65 ALR4th 93.

Validity, construction and effect of requirement under state statute or local ordinance giving local or locally qualified contractors a percentage preference in determining lowest bid, 89 ALR4th 587.

What entities or projects are “public” for purposes of state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 5 ALR5th 470.

Who is “employee,” “workman,” or the like, of contractor subject to state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 5 ALR5th 513.

What are “prevailing wages,” or the like, for purposes of state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 ALR5th 400.

Employers subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 ALR5th 444.

What projects involve work subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 ALR5th 337.

Employees' private right of action to enforce state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 ALR5th 360.

Authority of state, municipality, or other governmental entity to accept late bids for public works contracts, 49 ALR5th 747.

Standing of disappointed bidder on public contract to seek damages under 42 USC § 1983 for public authorities' alleged violation of bidding procedures, 86 ALR Fed 904.

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.

§ 16-6-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Resident” means a natural person, association or business entity authorized to be formed under title 17 of the Wyoming statutes, or the laws of another state that are the functional equivalent, and that is certified as a resident by the department of workforce services following receipt of an affidavit executed and sworn to by a chief executive officer of the entity setting forth information required by the department to determine compliance with this act and prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal, subject to the following criteria:

Any natural person who has been a resident of the state for one (1) year or more immediately prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal;

A business entity, each member or equity owner of which has been a resident of the state for one (1) year or more immediately prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal;

A business entity organized under the laws of the state:

With at least fifty percent (50%) of the equity in the business entity owned by persons who have been residents of the state for one (1) year or more prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal;

Which has maintained its principal office and place of business within the state for at least one (1) year; and

The chief executive officer of the business entity has been a resident of the state for one (1) year or more immediately prior to the business entity’s bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal.

A business entity organized under the laws of the state which has been in existence in the state for one (1) year or more and whose chief executive officer has been a resident of the state for one (1) year or more immediately prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal and maintains its principal office and place of business within the state. If at least fifty percent (50%) of the equity in the business entity is owned by nonresidents, the nonresident equity owned by the nonresidents shall:

Have been acquired by nonresidents one (1) year or more immediately prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal; or

If it consists of shares in a corporation, be publicly traded and registered under Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 for one (1) or more classes of its shares.

through (G) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 134 § 2.

(H)

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 82, § 2.

(J)

A business entity organized under the laws of any state which has been in existence for two (2) years or more:

Has continuously maintained a principal office and place of business within the state for at least one (1) year;

Has continuously employed not less than fifteen (15) full-time Wyoming resident employees within the state for one (1) year or more prior to bidding upon the contract or responding to a request for proposal; and

Has paid worker’s compensation and unemployment taxes in Wyoming for at least one (1) year and is in good standing with the department of workforce services at the time the bid or request for proposal is submitted.

(K)

A business entity which qualifies as a resident pursuant to this paragraph shall not lose that residency solely due to a conversion under the provisions of W.S.

17-26-101

or other reorganization as a different business entity;

(M)

No preference under this article shall be awarded to any contractor who is not a certified resident contractor at the time bids are submitted for a public capital construction project, and no contractor shall receive a contingent or retroactive resident certification.

“Principal office and place of business” means a headquarters or administrative center where:

The high level officers or management direct, control and coordinate the business activities; and

The key business functions are conducted, including, but not limited to project bidding.

“Chief executive officer” means:

For a corporation, the president of the corporation;

For a partnership other than a limited partnership, a partner;

For a limited partnership, a general partner;

For a limited liability company, a designated member or manager of the limited liability company;

For a business entity not specified in subdivisions (A) through (D) of this paragraph, the entity’s president, chairman of the executive committee, senior officer responsible for the entity’s business, chief financial officer or any other individual who performs similar functions as specified by rule of the department. The department may authorize by rule the execution of an affidavit required by paragraph (i) of this subsection by an individual holding a position other than as specified in this paragraph, if the individual holds a position with functions similar to a president of a corporation.

“Department” means the department of workforce services;

“Major maintenance” means the repair or replacement of complete or major portions of building and facility systems at irregular intervals which is required to continue the use of the building or facility at its original capacity for its original intended use and is typically accomplished by contractors due to the personnel demand to accomplish the work in a timely manner, the level of sophistication of the work or the need for warranted work;

“Laborer” means as defined in W.S. 16-6-202(a)(i);

“Materialman” means as defined in W.S. 29-1-201(a)(ix);

“Public entity” means the state of Wyoming, any state office, board, council, commission, separate operating agency, department, institution or other instrumentality or operating unit of the state, including the University of Wyoming, any political subdivision of the state, any county, city, town, school district, community college district or any public corporation of the state;

“Public work” includes alteration, construction, demolition, enlargement, improvement, major maintenance, reconstruction, renovation and repair of any highway, public building, public facility, public monument, public structure or public system;

“State procurement website” means a website that the state construction department designates to host information and notices related to procurement for public works;

“Substantial completion” or “substantially complete” means the public entity has determined that the construction of the public work or designated portion thereof is sufficiently complete in accordance with the contract and associated documents so that the work may be occupied or utilized for its intended purposes;

“This act” means W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 50, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 22-510; W.S. 1957, § 9-663; Laws 1961, ch. 152, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-8-301

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 223, § 2; 1988, ch. 14, § 1; 1989, ch. 156, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1999, ch. 152, § 1; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 163, § 1; 2011, ch. 82, §§ 1, 2; ch. 176, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or responding to a request for proposal” throughout (a).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted (i)(H), deleted “and subject to W.S.

16-6-102

” at the end of the introductory language in (a)(i), substituted “limited partnership, registered limited partnership, registered limited liability company or corporation, each member or shareholder of which has been a resident of” for “each member of which has been a resident of,” in (i)(B), rewrote (ii), substituted “16-6-121” for “16-6-119” in (iii); and made stylistic and related changes.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 82, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2011, inserted “following receipt of an affidavit executed by the president of the company or his designee of compliance with this act and” in the introduction of (a)(i); in (a)(i)(C), added the (a)(i)(C)(I) through (a)(i)(C)(III) designations; in (a)(i)(C)(II), substituted “has maintained” for “maintains” and inserted “for at least one (1) year”; repealed former (a)(i)(H) pertaining to criteria for residents; added (a)(i)(J) and (a)(i)(K); rewrote (a)(ii), which read: “ ‘Office and place of business’ means a headquarters or administrative center where business activities are conducted or controlled”; and made related changes.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 176, § 1, deleted “or” at the end of (a)(i)(A).

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 176, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 1 § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(i) and (a)(i)(J)(III).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 80 § 1, in the introductory language of (a)(i), inserted “natural” and “association,” deleted “of employment” and substituted “and sworn to by a chief executive officer of the entity setting forth information required by the department to determine” for “by the president of the company of his designee of”; in (a)(i)(J)(III), substituted “the department” for “Wyoming worker's compensation and department of employment”; added (a)(iii) and (a)(iv); and redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(v).

Laws 2012, ch. 80 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (a)(i); added “designated” and “or manager” in (a)(iii)(D); added (a)(v); and redesignated former (a)(v) as (a)(vi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(vi) through (a)(xi); and redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(xii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) or (a)(i)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Securities Exchange Act. —

The federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, referred to in subdivision (a)(i)(D)(II), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

Party found to be resident Wyoming corporation. —

See Kloefkorn-Ballard Constr. & Dev., Inc. v. North Big Horn Hosp. Dist., 683 P.2d 656,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1984).

Applied

in

Harding v. State, 478 P.2d 64,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1970).

Quoted

in

Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 16-6-102.
Resident contractors; preference limitation with reference to lowest bid or qualified response; decertification; denial of application for residency.

If a contract is let by a public entity for a public work, the contract shall be let, if advertisement for bids or request for proposal is not required, to a resident of the state. If advertisement for bids is required, the contract shall be let to the responsible certified resident making the lowest bid if the certified resident’s bid is not more than five percent (5%) higher than that of the lowest responsible nonresident bidder.

If any person who is certified as a resident contractor for any reason loses that certification, that person may not be recertified as a resident for a period of one (1) year from the date of decertification.

If any person who applies for certification as a resident contractor is denied certification because of not meeting the residency requirements, that person may not reapply for certification for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date certification is denied. No person shall be denied certification because of inadvertent omission of information, as determined by the department of workforce services, on an application for resident certification.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 163, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 163, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 163, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 152, § 2.

The department shall make investigations as necessary to determine whether any person is eligible to receive or continue to hold a certificate of residency. The department may require or permit any person to file a statement in writing at any time, under oath or otherwise as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated. For the purpose of any investigation under this section, the director of the department or any person designated by him may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, and compel their attendance, take evidence and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements or other documents or records, which the director or designated person deems relevant or material to the inquiry. In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, any Wyoming district court, upon application by the director, may issue to the person an order requiring him to appear before the director or the officer designated by him, to produce documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt of court. The burden of proof regarding the status of the residency is on the person whose residency is in question.

If, after investigation, the department believes that a certificate of residency should be denied or revoked, it shall provide notice to the applicant or certificate holder of its intent to deny or revoke the certificate and of the applicant or certificate holder’s opportunity for a hearing if requested. Any hearing conducted under this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 50, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 22-507; W.S. 1957, § 9-664; W.S. 1977, §

9-8-302

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 14, § 1; 1989, ch. 156, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1994, ch. 30, § 1; 1999, ch. 152, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 163, § 2; 2010, ch. 111, § 1; 2011, ch. 82, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “Unless an alternate design and construction delivery method is used” in (a).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (d), (d)(i), and (d)(1)(A), pertaining to grounds for the revocation of a certificate of residency.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “If advertisement for bids” for “Unless an alternate design and construction delivery method is used, if advertisement for bids or request for proposal,” and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (e), substituted “shall” for “may” in the first sentence, inserted “at any time” in the second sentence, and added the present last sentence.

The 2012 amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (c).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 80, § 1, deleted “of employment” following “department” in (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 80 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Neither amendment gave effect to the other and this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “the construction, major maintenance
or renovation” for “erection, construction, alteration or repair” in (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “let by a public entity for a public work” for “let by the state, any department thereof, or any county, city, town, school district, community college district or other public corporation of the state for the construction, major maintenance or renovation of any public building, or other public structure, or for making any addition thereto, or for any public work or improvements.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (d)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

This act shall only apply to any contract initially offered or advertised for bids or request for proposal on or after the effective date of this act.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Section is rationally related to the advancement of a legitimate state interest

of encouraging local industry. Galesburg Constr. Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982).

And constitutional. —

This section does not violate art. 1, § 3, Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const., or U.S. Const., amend. 14. Galesburg Constr. Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982).

Lowest resident bidder, denied spraying contract, not denied property right. —

A dusting pilot engaged in the weed and pest control business, who was denied a spraying contract by a private, nonprofit corporation despite being the lowest resident bidder, did not establish his federal civil rights claim. The private corporation's receipt of substantial amount of public funding from a county weed and pest control district, a public corporation, did not convert its status to that of a public corporation. Thus, the pilot had no more than a unilateral expectation of a statutory preference right under this section, and not a legitimate claim of entitlement, i.e., property right. Wright v. No Skiter, Inc., 774 F.2d 422, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 21844 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Section preempts field of residential preference

and a city's attempt to legislate in the area of residential preference conflicts with this legislation, uniformly applicable to cities and towns. City of Green River v. Debernardi Constr. Co., 816 P.2d 1287,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1991), overruled, W. Wyo. Constr. Co. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2013 WY 63, 301 P.3d 512,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2013).

Subsidiary state corporation maintaining existence separate from parent out-of-state corporation deemed resident bidder. —

A state corporation which was a subsidiary of an out-of-state corporation, but which maintained a separate existence, was not governed by the parent corporation, and which had the necessary personnel, equipment and funds (including a note from the parent corporation in writing and requiring the state corporation to pay interest), was a responsible resident bidder and not merely an instrumentality of the parent corporation. Kloefkorn-Ballard Constr. & Dev., Inc. v. North Big Horn Hosp. Dist., 683 P.2d 656,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1984).

Substantial evidence of violation not found. —

A finding by the department of employment, labor standards division, state of Wyoming, that a certified resident contractor was using its certificate of residency primarily as a device to obtain benefits of residency for a nonresident contractor was not supported by substantial evidence where the hearing examiner exhibited a disregard of uncontradicted evidence and drew unwarranted conclusions from the facts presented. Department of Emp. v. Roberts Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 854,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

Harding v. State, 478 P.2d 64,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1970); Westates Constr. Co. v. Sheridan County Sch. Dist., 719 P.2d 1366,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 559

(Wyo. 1986); State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State v. Antonich, 694 P.2d 60,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 535

(Wyo. 1985); Western Wyo. Constr. Co. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs of Sublette, 2015 WY 77,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(May 27, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Equal Protection Analysis. Awarding Public Works Contracts: Granting Preference to Resident Bidders. Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 393 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination of amount involved in contract within statutory provisions requiring public contracts involving sums exceeding specified amount to be let to lowest bidder, 53 ALR2d 498.

Authority of state, municipality, or other governmental entity to accept late bids for public works contracts, 49 ALR5th 747.

§ 16-6-103.
Limitation on subcontracting by resident contractors.

A successful resident bidder shall not subcontract more than thirty percent (30%) of the work covered by his contract to nonresident contractors.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 50, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 22-508; W.S. 1957, § 9-665; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-303; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2007, ch. 163, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “thirty percent (30%)” for “twenty percent (20%).”

§ 16-6-104.
Preference for Wyoming materials required in contracts.

Wyoming made materials and products, and Wyoming suppliers of products and materials of equal quality and desirability shall have preference over materials or products produced or supplied outside the state and any contract let shall so provide. The preference created by this section shall be applied in a manner identical to the preference for residence contractors in W.S.

16-6-102

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 50, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 22-509; W.S. 1957, § 9-666; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-304; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 50, § 1; 2011, ch. 82, § 1; 2012, ch. 106, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “Resident Wyoming laborers, workmen and mechanics shall be used upon all work enumerated in W.S.

16-6-102

whenever possible and any contract let shall so provide.”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “made materials and products, and Wyoming suppliers of products and materials” for “materials and products,” added “or supplied,” and added the present last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of state statute or local ordinance requiring, or giving preference to, the employment of residents by contractors or subcontractors engaged in, or awarded contracts for, the construction of public works or improvements, 36 ALR4th 941.

Validity, construction, and application of state “Buy American” acts, 107 ALR5th 673.

Requirement of Buy American Act (41 USC §§ 10a — 10d) that American made articles be preferred in government contracts, 58 ALR Fed 312.

Validity, construction, and operation of Buy American Act (§§
41 U.S.C.A. 10a-10d), 185 ALR Fed 253.

§ 16-6-105.
Preference for Wyoming materials and Wyoming agricultural products required in public purchases; exception; cost differential; definition.

A five percent (5%) materials preference for Wyoming materials shall be applied in public purchases, subject to the following:

The preference requirement shall apply to all public entities;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 31, § 2.

As used in this section, “materials” means supplies, material, agricultural products, equipment, machinery and provisions to be used in a public work, including the regular maintenance and upkeep of a public work;

The preference shall be applied in favor of materials that are produced, manufactured or grown in this state, or that are supplied by a resident of the state who is competent and capable to provide the materials within the state of Wyoming;

Preference shall not be granted for materials of inferior quality to those offered by competitors outside of the state.

As used in this section, “agricultural products” means any horticultural, viticultural, vegetable product, livestock, livestock product, bees or honey, poultry or poultry product, sheep or wool product, timber or timber product.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 50, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-301; C.S. 1945, § 19-1501; W.S. 1957, § 9-667; Laws 1969, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-305; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 69, § 1; 1997, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 163, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 31, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “of contracts less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) for”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “the construction, major maintenance and renovation” for the maintenance and upkeep” in the first sentence, deleted “less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)” following “cost of contracts” in the present third sentence, and made stylistic changes in the present second and third sentence of (a).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, redesignated the introductory language of (a) as (a)(i), added “all public entities” at the end, and made stylistic changes; repealed (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(C), which read “(A) Every board, commission or other governing body of any state institution; (B) Every person acting as purchasing agent for the board, commission or other governing body of any state institution or department; and (C) Every county, municipality, school district and community college district”; and in (a)(ii) substituted “used in a public work, including the” for “used in the construction, major maintenance, renovation” and “upkeep of a public work” for “upkeep of public institutions.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and operation of Buy American Act (§§
41 U.S.C.A. 10a-10d), 185 ALR Fed 253.

§ 16-6-106.
Statement of Wyoming materials preference in requests for bids and proposals.

All requests by a public entity for bids and proposals for materials, supplies, agricultural products, equipment, machinery and public works shall contain the words “preference is hereby given to materials, supplies, agricultural products, equipment, machinery and provisions produced, manufactured or grown in Wyoming, or supplied by a resident of the state, quality being equal to articles offered by the competitors outside of the state”.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 50, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 108-302; C.S. 1945, § 19-1502; W.S. 1957, § 9-668; Laws 1969, ch. 188, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-306; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 163, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “ supplied” following “manufactured” and inserted “or supplied by a resident of the state”; and made a related change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “the construction, major maintenance and renovation” for “the construction, maintenance and upkeep.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “All requests by a public entity for bids” for “All requests for bids” and “machinery and public works shall” for “machinery and provisions for the construction, major maintenance and renovation of every state, county, municipal, community college district or school district institution shall.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of state, municipality, or other governmental entity to accept late bids for public works contracts, 49 ALR5th 747.

Validity, construction, and operation of Buy American Act (§§ 41 U.S.C.A. 10a-10d), 185 ALR Fed 253.

§ 16-6-107.
Wyoming materials preference required in public works; exception.

All public works in this state shall be constructed and maintained using materials produced or manufactured in Wyoming if Wyoming materials are suitable and can be furnished in marketable quantities. Preference shall not be granted for materials of an inferior quality to those offered by competitors outside of the state, but a differential of five percent (5%) shall be allowed in cost of materials produced or manufactured in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 50, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 108-303; C.S. 1945, § 19-1503; W.S. 1957, § 9-669; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-307; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2007, ch. 163, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “contracts less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) for the.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “using materials” for “by materials” and added “for construction, major maintenance and renovation projects” in the first sentence and rewrote the second sentence, which read: “Preference shall not be granted for materials of an inferior quality to those offered by competitors outside of the state, but a differential of not to exceed five percent (5%) may be allowed in cost of contracts less than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) for the Wyoming materials of equal quality as against materials from states having or enforcing a preference rule against ‘out-of-state’ products.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “All public works” for “All public buildings, courthouses, public school buildings, public monuments and other public structures constructed” and “in Wyoming if Wyoming materials” for “in Wyoming for construction, major maintenance and renovation projects if Wyoming materials.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 4, ch. 50, Laws 1931, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 16-6-108.
Governing of federal funds by federal law.

The operation of this act upon the letting of any public works contract above mentioned, in connection with which, funds are granted or advanced by the United States of America, shall be subject to the effect, if any, of related laws of the United States and valid rules and regulations of federal agencies in charge, governing use and payment of the federal funds.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 50, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 22-511; W.S. 1957, § 9-670; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-308; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 16-6-101(a)(vi).

Severability. —

Section 6, ch. 50, Laws 1939, reads: “If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of this act, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 7, ch. 50, Laws 1939, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Federal funding of public contracts. —

Wyoming Public Works Act expressly recognizes that any public works contracts in Wyoming which are funded in part by a federal agency are subject to federal law. Whitlock Constr., Inc. v. S. Big Horn County Water Supply Joint Powers Bd., 2002 WY 36, 41 P.3d 1261,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requirement under defense procurement and general procurement statutes (10 USC § 2306(b); 41 USC § 254(a)) and regulations promulgated thereunder (32 CFR §§ 1 — 1500 et seq.; 41 CFR §§ 1 — 1.500 et seq.) that government contract for property and services contain warranty against commissions or contingent fees, 60 ALR Fed 263.

§ 16-6-109.
Use of insurance for rebuilding state structures.

When buildings belonging to the state are destroyed, the insurance on the buildings shall be collected by the state treasurer. The governing board of the state institution suffering the loss may draw on the state treasurer for the amount of money collected and use the insurance money for the rebuilding of the structure destroyed if, in the opinion of the governing board, the structure should be rebuilt.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 12, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 108-201; C.S. 1945, § 22-512; W.S. 1957, § 9-671; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-309; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “by fire” following “destroyed” in two places and following “the loss” once, and made a stylistic change.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 12, Laws 1925, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 16-6-110.
Limitation on work hours; overtime; exceptions.

No person shall require laborers, workmen or mechanics to work more than eight (8) hours in any one (1) calendar day or forty (40) hours in any one (1) week upon any public works of a public entity except as hereafter authorized. A laborer, workman or mechanic may agree to work more than eight (8) hours per day or more than forty (40) hours in any week, provided the laborer, workman or mechanic shall be paid at the rate of one and one-half (1 1/2) times the regularly established hourly rate for all work in excess of forty (40) hours in any one (1) week. This section does not apply:

In case of emergency caused by fire, flood or danger to life or property; or

To work upon public or military works or defenses in time of war.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 90, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4308; Laws 1931, ch. 130, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 63-101; C.S. 1945, § 22-514; W.S. 1957, § 9-672; Laws 1967, ch. 27, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-310; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 86, § 1; 1988, ch. 95, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to eight-hour day on state and municipal works, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to hours of labor generally, see §

27-5-101

et seq.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “public works of a public entity” for “public works of the state or any of its political subdivisions,” “A laborer, workman or mechanic may agree” for “An employee may agree,” and “provided the laborer, workman or mechanic shall be” for “provided the employee shall be.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Provisions of this section are a valid exercise of the legislative power

and are therefore constitutional to that extent. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Contractor doing street paving for municipality is engaged in “public works.”

State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What contracts are subject to wage and hour requirements of 2 ALR Fed 637.

§ 16-6-111.
Penalty for violating work hours provisions.

Any person who violates this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 90, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 4309; R.S. 1931, § 63-102; C.S. 1945, § 22-515; W.S. 1957, § 9-673; Laws 1969, ch. 188, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-311; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2011, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 16-6-101(a)(vi).